bg_BG_IV.aff
FLAG long					
SFX	P1	Y	196		
SFX	P1		га	га	.
SFX	P1		га	жешъ	.
SFX	P1		га	же	.
SFX	P1		га	жемъ	.
SFX	P1		га	жете	.
SFX	P1		га	гатъ	.
SFX	P1		га	жахъ	.
SFX	P1		га	жа	.
SFX	P1		га	жа	.
SFX	P1		га	жахме	.
SFX	P1		га	жахте	.
SFX	P1		га	жаха	.
SFX	P1		га	жехъ	.
SFX	P1		га	жеше	.
SFX	P1		га	жеше	.
SFX	P1		га	жехме	.
SFX	P1		га	жехте	.
SFX	P1		га	жеха	.
SFX	P1		га	жещъ/L3	.
SFX	P1		га	гълъ/L1	.
SFX	P1		га	желъ/L2	.
SFX	P1		видя	вижъ	.
SFX	P1		видя	вижте	.
SFX	P1		дойда	ела	.
SFX	P1		дойда	елате	.
SFX	P1		държа	държа	.
SFX	P1		държа	държишъ	.
SFX	P1		държа	държи	.
SFX	P1		държа	държимъ	.
SFX	P1		държа	държите	.
SFX	P1		държа	държатъ	.
SFX	P1		държа	държахъ	.
SFX	P1		държа	държа	.
SFX	P1		държа	държа	.
SFX	P1		държа	държимъ	.
SFX	P1		държа	държите	.
SFX	P1		държа	държатъ	.
SFX	P1		държа	държехъ	.
SFX	P1		държа	държеше	.
SFX	P1		държа	държеше	.
SFX	P1		държа	държехме	.
SFX	P1		държа	държехте	.
SFX	P1		държа	държеха	.
SFX	P1		държа	дръжъ	.
SFX	P1		държа	дръжте	.
SFX	P1		държа	държалъ/L5	.
SFX	P1		държа	държелъ/L2	.
SFX	P1		коля	коля	.
SFX	P1		коля	колишъ	.
SFX	P1		коля	коли	.
SFX	P1		коля	колимъ	.
SFX	P1		коля	колите	.
SFX	P1		коля	колятъ	.
SFX	P1		коля	колихъ	.
SFX	P1		коля	коли	.
SFX	P1		коля	коли	.
SFX	P1		коля	колихме	.
SFX	P1		коля	колихте	.
SFX	P1		коля	колиха	.
SFX	P1		коля	клахъ	.
SFX	P1		коля	кла	.
SFX	P1		коля	кла	.
SFX	P1		коля	клахме	.
SFX	P1		коля	клахте	.
SFX	P1		коля	клаха	.
SFX	P1		коля	колѣхъ	.
SFX	P1		коля	колѣше	.
SFX	P1		коля	колѣше	.
SFX	P1		коля	колѣхме	.
SFX	P1		коля	колѣхте	.
SFX	P1		коля	колѣха	.
SFX	P1		коля	коли	.
SFX	P1		коля	колете	.
SFX	P1		коля	клалъ/L5	.
SFX	P1		коля	колилъ/L2	.
SFX	P1		коля	колѣлъ/L2	.
SFX	P1		кълна	кълна	.
SFX	P1		кълна	кълнешъ	.
SFX	P1		кълна	кълне	.
SFX	P1		кълна	кълнемъ	.
SFX	P1		кълна	кълнете	.
SFX	P1		кълна	кълнатъ	.
SFX	P1		кълна	клѣхъ	.
SFX	P1		кълна	клѣ	.
SFX	P1		кълна	клѣ	.
SFX	P1		кълна	клѣхме	.
SFX	P1		кълна	клѣхте	.
SFX	P1		кълна	клѣха	.
SFX	P1		кълна	кълнѣхъ	.
SFX	P1		кълна	кълнѣше	.
SFX	P1		кълна	кълнѣше	.
SFX	P1		кълна	кълнѣхме	.
SFX	P1		кълна	кълнѣхте	.
SFX	P1		кълна	кълнѣха	.
SFX	P1		кълна	кълни	.
SFX	P1		кълна	кълнете	.
SFX	P1		кълна	клѣлъ/L5	.
SFX	P1		кълна	кълнѣлъ/L2	.
SFX	P1		меля	меля	.
SFX	P1		меля	мелишъ	.
SFX	P1		меля	мели	.
SFX	P1		меля	мелимъ	.
SFX	P1		меля	мелите	.
SFX	P1		меля	мелятъ	.
SFX	P1		меля	млѣхъ	.
SFX	P1		меля	млѣ	.
SFX	P1		меля	млѣ	.
SFX	P1		меля	млѣхме	.
SFX	P1		меля	млѣхте	.
SFX	P1		меля	млѣха	.
SFX	P1		меля	мелихъ	.
SFX	P1		меля	мели	.
SFX	P1		меля	мели	.
SFX	P1		меля	мелихме	.
SFX	P1		меля	мелихте	.
SFX	P1		меля	мелиха	.
SFX	P1		меля	мелѣхъ	.
SFX	P1		меля	мелѣше	.
SFX	P1		меля	мелѣше	.
SFX	P1		меля	мелѣхме	.
SFX	P1		меля	мелѣхте	.
SFX	P1		меля	мелѣха	.
SFX	P1		меля	мели	.
SFX	P1		меля	мелете	.
SFX	P1		меля	мли	.
SFX	P1		меля	млете	.
SFX	P1		меля	млѣлъ/L5	.
SFX	P1		меля	мелѣлъ/L2	.
SFX	P1		раста	раста	.
SFX	P1		раста	растешъ	.
SFX	P1		раста	расте	.
SFX	P1		раста	растемъ	.
SFX	P1		раста	растете	.
SFX	P1		раста	растатъ	.
SFX	P1		раста	растохъ	.
SFX	P1		раста	растѣ	.
SFX	P1		раста	растѣ	.
SFX	P1		раста	растохме	.
SFX	P1		раста	растохте	.
SFX	P1		раста	растоха	.
SFX	P1		раста	растѣхъ	.
SFX	P1		раста	растѣше	.
SFX	P1		раста	растѣше	.
SFX	P1		раста	растѣхме	.
SFX	P1		раста	растѣхте	.
SFX	P1		раста	растѣха	.
SFX	P1		раста	расти	.
SFX	P1		раста	растете	.
SFX	P1		раста	расълъ/L1	.
SFX	P1		раста	растѣлъ/L2	.
SFX	P1		спя	спя	.
SFX	P1		спя	спишъ	.
SFX	P1		спя	спи	.
SFX	P1		спя	спимъ	.
SFX	P1		спя	спите	.
SFX	P1		спя	спятъ	.
SFX	P1		спя	спахъ	.
SFX	P1		спя	спа	.
SFX	P1		спя	спа	.
SFX	P1		спя	спахме	.
SFX	P1		спя	спахте	.
SFX	P1		спя	спаха	.
SFX	P1		спя	спѣхъ	.
SFX	P1		спя	спѣше	.
SFX	P1		спя	спѣше	.
SFX	P1		спя	спѣхме	.
SFX	P1		спя	спѣхте	.
SFX	P1		спя	спѣха	.
SFX	P1		спя	спи	.
SFX	P1		спя	спете	.
SFX	P1		спя	спалъ/L5	.
SFX	P1		спя	спѣлъ/L2	.
SFX	P1		стоя	стоя	.
SFX	P1		стоя	стоишъ	.
SFX	P1		стоя	стои	.
SFX	P1		стоя	стоимъ	.
SFX	P1		стоя	стоите	.
SFX	P1		стоя	стоятъ	.
SFX	P1		стоя	стояхъ	.
SFX	P1		стоя	стоя	.
SFX	P1		стоя	стоя	.
SFX	P1		стоя	стояхме	.
SFX	P1		стоя	стояхте	.
SFX	P1		стоя	стояха	.
SFX	P1		стоя	стоехъ	.
SFX	P1		стоя	стоеше	.
SFX	P1		стоя	стоеше	.
SFX	P1		стоя	стоехме	.
SFX	P1		стоя	стоехте	.
SFX	P1		стоя	стоеха	.
SFX	P1		стоя	стой	.
SFX	P1		стоя	стойте	.
SFX	P1		стоя	стоялъ/L5	.
SFX	P1		стоя	стоялъ/L2	.
SFX	P1		стоя	стоелъ/L5	.
SFX	P1		стоя	стоелъ/L2	.
					
SFX	P2	Y	10		
SFX	P2		държа	държанъ/L4	.
SFX	P2		коля	колeнъ/L4	.
SFX	P2		коля	кланъ/L4	.
SFX	P2		кълна	клѣтъ/L4	.
SFX	P2		меля	мелѣнъ/L4	.
SFX	P2		меля	млѣнъ/L4	.
SFX	P2		меля	млѣтъ/L4	.
SFX	P2		спя	спанъ/L4	.
SFX	P2		стоя	стоянъ/L4	.
SFX	P2		стоя	стоeнъ/L4	.
					
SFX	P3	Y	14		
SFX	P3		държа	държейки	.
SFX	P3		държа	държащъ/L3	.
SFX	P3		коля	колѣйки	.
SFX	P3		коля	колѣщъ/L3	.
SFX	P3		кълна	кълнѣйки	.
SFX	P3		кълна	кълнѣщъ/L3	.
SFX	P3		меля	мелѣйки	.
SFX	P3		меля	мелѣщъ/L3	.
SFX	P3		раста	растѣйки	.
SFX	P3		раста	растѣщъ/L3	.
SFX	P3		спя	спѣйки	.
SFX	P3		спя	спѣщъ/L3	.
SFX	P3		стоя	стоейки	.
SFX	P3		стоя	стоящъ/L3	.
					
SFX	Q0	Y	44		
SFX	Q0		на	на	.
SFX	Q0		на	нешъ	.
SFX	Q0		на	не	.
SFX	Q0		на	немъ	.
SFX	Q0		на	нете	.
SFX	Q0		на	натъ	.
SFX	Q0		на	нахъ	.
SFX	Q0		на	на	.
SFX	Q0		на	на	.
SFX	Q0		на	нахме	.
SFX	Q0		на	нахте	.
SFX	Q0		на	наха	.
SFX	Q0		на	нехъ	.
SFX	Q0		на	неше	.
SFX	Q0		на	неше	.
SFX	Q0		на	нехме	.
SFX	Q0		на	нехте	.
SFX	Q0		на	неха	.
SFX	Q0		на	ни	.
SFX	Q0		на	нете	.
SFX	Q0		на	налъ/L5	.
SFX	Q0		на	нелъ/L2	.
SFX	Q0		я	я	.
SFX	Q0		я	ишъ	.
SFX	Q0		я	и	.
SFX	Q0		я	имъ	.
SFX	Q0		я	ите	.
SFX	Q0		я	ятъ	.
SFX	Q0		я	ихъ	.
SFX	Q0		я	и	.
SFX	Q0		я	и	.
SFX	Q0		я	ихме	.
SFX	Q0		я	ихте	.
SFX	Q0		я	иха	.
SFX	Q0		я	ѣхъ	.
SFX	Q0		я	ѣше	.
SFX	Q0		я	ѣше	.
SFX	Q0		я	ѣхме	.
SFX	Q0		я	ѣхте	.
SFX	Q0		я	ѣха	.
SFX	Q0		я	и	.
SFX	Q0		я	ете	.
SFX	Q0		я	илъ/L5	.
SFX	Q0		я	ѣлъ/L2	.
					
SFX	Q1	Y	2		
SFX	Q1		а	атъ/L4	.
SFX	Q1		я	енъ/L4	.
					
SFX	Q2	Y	4		
SFX	Q2		на	нещъ/L3	.
SFX	Q2		на	нейки	.
SFX	Q2		я	ѣщъ/L3	.
SFX	Q2		я	ѣйки	.
					
SFX	R0	Y	44		
SFX	R0		ера	ера	.
SFX	R0		ера	ерешъ	.
SFX	R0		ера	ере	.
SFX	R0		ера	еремъ	.
SFX	R0		ера	ерете	.
SFX	R0		ера	ератъ	.
SFX	R0		ера	рахъ	.
SFX	R0		ера	ра	.
SFX	R0		ера	ра	.
SFX	R0		ера	рахме	.
SFX	R0		ера	рахте	.
SFX	R0		ера	раха	.
SFX	R0		ера	ерѣхъ	.
SFX	R0		ера	ерѣше	.
SFX	R0		ера	ерѣше	.
SFX	R0		ера	ерѣхме	.
SFX	R0		ера	ерѣхте	.
SFX	R0		ера	ерѣха	.
SFX	R0		ера	ери	.
SFX	R0		ера	ерете	.
SFX	R0		ера	ралъ/L5	.
SFX	R0		ера	ерѣлъ/L2	.
SFX	R0		ша	ша	.
SFX	R0		ша	шешъ	.
SFX	R0		ша	ше	.
SFX	R0		ша	шемъ	.
SFX	R0		ша	шете	.
SFX	R0		ша	шатъ	.
SFX	R0		ша	сахъ	.
SFX	R0		ша	са	.
SFX	R0		ша	са	.
SFX	R0		ша	сахме	.
SFX	R0		ша	сахте	.
SFX	R0		ша	саха	.
SFX	R0		ша	шехъ	.
SFX	R0		ша	шеше	.
SFX	R0		ша	шеше	.
SFX	R0		ша	шехме	.
SFX	R0		ша	шехте	.
SFX	R0		ша	шеха	.
SFX	R0		ша	ши	.
SFX	R0		ша	шете	.
SFX	R0		ша	салъ/L5	.
SFX	R0		ша	шелъ/L2	.
					
SFX	R1	Y	2		
SFX	R1		ера	ранъ/L4	.
SFX	R1		ша	санъ/L4	.
					
SFX	R2	Y	4		
SFX	R2		ера	ерѣщъ/L3	.
SFX	R2		ера	ерѣйки	.
SFX	R2		ша	шещъ/L3	.
SFX	R2		ша	шейки	.
					
SFX	S0	Y	44		
SFX	S0		амъ	амъ	.
SFX	S0		амъ	ашъ	.
SFX	S0		амъ	а	.
SFX	S0		амъ	аме	.
SFX	S0		амъ	ате	.
SFX	S0		амъ	атъ	.
SFX	S0		амъ	ахъ	.
SFX	S0		амъ	а	.
SFX	S0		амъ	а	.
SFX	S0		амъ	ахме	.
SFX	S0		амъ	ахте	.
SFX	S0		амъ	аха	.
SFX	S0		амъ	ахъ	.
SFX	S0		амъ	аше	.
SFX	S0		амъ	аше	.
SFX	S0		амъ	ахме	.
SFX	S0		амъ	ахте	.
SFX	S0		амъ	аха	.
SFX	S0		амъ	ай	.
SFX	S0		амъ	айте	.
SFX	S0		амъ	алъ/L5	.
SFX	S0		амъ	алъ/L2	.
SFX	S0		я	я	.
SFX	S0		я	ишъ	.
SFX	S0		я	и	.
SFX	S0		я	имъ	.
SFX	S0		я	ите	.
SFX	S0		я	ятъ	.
SFX	S0		я	ѣхъ	.
SFX	S0		я	ѣ	.
SFX	S0		я	ѣ	.
SFX	S0		я	ѣхме	.
SFX	S0		я	ѣхте	.
SFX	S0		я	ѣха	.
SFX	S0		я	ѣхъ	.
SFX	S0		я	ѣше	.
SFX	S0		я	ѣше	.
SFX	S0		я	ѣхме	.
SFX	S0		я	ѣхте	.
SFX	S0		я	ѣха	.
SFX	S0		я	и	.
SFX	S0		я	ете	.
SFX	S0		я	ѣлъ/L5	.
SFX	S0		я	ѣлъ/L2	.
					
SFX	S1	Y	2		
SFX	S1		амъ	анъ/L4	.
SFX	S1		я	ѣнъ/L4	.
					
SFX	S2	Y	4		
SFX	S2		амъ	ащъ/L3	.
SFX	S2		амъ	айки	.
SFX	S2		я	ѣщъ/L3	.
SFX	S2		я	ѣйки	.
					
SFX	S3	Y	7		
SFX	S3		я	ихъ	.
SFX	S3		я	и	.
SFX	S3		я	и	.
SFX	S3		я	ихме	.
SFX	S3		я	ихте	.
SFX	S3		я	иха	.
SFX	S3		я	илъ/L5	.
					
